Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 32
RAINFALL — ARTIFICIAL PRODUCTION

Sec.

§ 22-3201. Registration of producers of artificial rainfall.

Any person, persons, association, firm, or corporation conducting or intending to conduct within the state of Idaho operations to assist artificially in production of or to produce artificially rainfall shall register with the department of agriculture of the state of Idaho.

Such registration shall require the filing of the name of the person, association, or corporation, its residence, or principal place of business in the state of Idaho and the general nature of the business to be conducted.

History.

1957, ch. 106, § 1, p. 184.

§ 22-3202. Log of activities filed with department of agriculture.

Such person, persons, association, firm or corporation shall thereafter file with the said department of agriculture a log of all its activities in the production, artificially, within this state, of rainfall.

History.

1957, ch. 106, § 2, p. 184.